Utah statutes.
31A-19a-210.   Dividend and participating plans.
(1) (a)  This part does not prohibit the distribution by an insurer to a
policyholder of any of the following allowed or returned by the insurer:
(i)  dividends;
(ii)  savings; or
(iii)  unabsorbed premium deposits.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), an insurer may not distribute
dividends, savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits to an entity that has no
insurable interest in the insurance.
(2)  An insurer may not unfairly discriminate between policyholders in the
payment of dividends, savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits.
(3) (a)  A declaration of dividends or schedule explaining the basis for the
distribution of dividends, savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or
returned by an insurer to its policyholders is not a rating plan or system if
the insurer:
(i)  determines and declares the declaration or schedule after a specified
policy accounting period; and
(ii)  files the declaration or schedule pursuant to Section 31A-21-310.
(b)  A declaration or schedule described under Subsection (3)(a) is not
required to be filed with the commissioner under this chapter.
(4) (a)  A dividend or participating plan developed by insurers establishing
given criteria for eligibility and the general basis for distribution for a
dividend, if declared, is considered a rating plan if the plan is to be
applicable to an insurance policy from its inception.
(b)  A plan described in Subsection (4)(a) shall be filed with the
commissioner pursuant to this part.
(5)  An insurer may not make the distribution of a dividend or any portion of
a dividend conditioned upon renewal of the policy or contract.
